Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2326
Retirement benefits; declared additional to benefits under federal Social Security Act.

The retirement allowances and benefits provided for by the County Employees Retirement Act shall be in addition to benefits and allowances payable under the provisions of the federal Social Security Act.

Laws 1965, c. 94, § 26, p. 410;

Laws 1985, LB 347, § 13.